Hawaii statutes.
[§132C-7] Exemption. Nothing in this
chapter shall be construed to prohibit any person from manufacturing or selling
cigarettes that do not meet the requirements of this chapter, if the cigarettes
are or will be stamped for sale in another state or are to be sold outside the United States. [L 2008, c 218, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next